Tennessee, session 114, HB0789.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-943(b)(4), is amended by
deleting "no later than sixteen (16) months after completing high school".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to scholarships awarded for the 2025-2026 academic year and for each academic year
thereafter.
HB0789
001841
- 1 -